New York, session 2025-2026, S5950.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Report on economic impact of the Labor Day Parade (West 2 Indian Carnival). 1. The empire state development corporation shall 3 prepare a summary report on the economic impact of the Labor Day Parade 4 (West Indian Carnival) held in the borough of Brooklyn. Such report 5 shall include, but not be limited to, the following: 6 a. the number of participants in such parade, including a breakdown of 7 resident and non-resident participants; 8 b. an estimate of money spent by participants in the parade including 9 but not limited to expenditures on hotels and motels and restaurants; 10 and 11 c. an estimate of the number of jobs and/or businesses that are 12 supported by participants as well as the amount of sales tax and income 13 tax generated by such participants. 14 2. The results of the report required by this act shall be submitted 15 to the governor and to the legislature no later than January 1, 2027, 16 along with any legislative recommendations of the empire state develop- 17 ment corporation to further enhance the economic impact of Labor Day 18 Parade (West Indian Carnival). 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10553-01-5